Utah statutes.
9-1-201.   Department of Heritage and Arts -- Creation -- Powers and duties.

(1)  There is created the Department of Heritage and Arts.

(2)  The department shall:

(a)  be responsible for preserving and promoting the heritage of the state, the arts in the state, and cultural development within the state;

(b)  perform heritage, arts, and cultural development planning for the state;

(c)  coordinate the program plans of the various divisions within the department;

(d)  administer and coordinate all state or federal grant programs which are, or become, available for heritage, arts, and cultural development;

(e)  administer any other programs over which the department is given administrative supervision by the governor;

(f)  annually submit a report to the governor and the Legislature; and

(g)  perform any other duties as provided by the Legislature.

(3)  The department may solicit and accept contributions of money, services, and facilities from any other sources, public or private, but may not use those contributions for publicizing the exclusive interest of the donor.

(4)  Money received under Subsection (3) shall be deposited in the General Fund as restricted revenues of the department.

